Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2475.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 515. Pet Fees.--(a) A landlord shall not charge a tenant an ongoing or upfront fee or rent for the tenant to maintain one or more common household pets. This section does not prohibit a landlord from charging a monthly pet deposit to be deposited in escrow for the payment of damages to the leasehold premises during the duration of a lease. A monthly pet deposit must be equivalent to no more than one per cent of the monthly rent, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) over the 12345678910111213141516171819 term of the lease. The deposit shall be assessed on a per unit basis subject to the requirements set forth in sections 511 and 512.(b) This section shall not be construed to limit or otherwise affect applicable State and local laws or government ordinances related to public health, animal control and animal anticruelty, or other statutes or laws that require reasonable accommodations to be made for an individual with a disability who maintains an animal to provide assistance, service or support.(c) As used in this section, the term "common household pet" means a dog, cat, bird, rodent, fish, turtle or other domestic animal that is traditionally kept in the home for noncommercial, pleasure purposes.Section 2. The addition of section 515 of the act shall apply to leases entered into or extended on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2475PN3335 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718